New Jersey, session 221, A4221.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  No later than 90 days after the effective date of this act, the Department of Human Services shall conduct a review of the reimbursement rates paid by the States child care assistance program to child care providers participating in the program to ensure that the reimbursement rates adequately compensate child care providers offering services during non-traditional hours, including, but not limited to, early morning and late evening hours. b.  If, based on the review, the department determines that the reimbursement rates are not adequate to compensate child providers offering services during non-traditional hours, the department shall seek out and apply for all sources of federal funding as may be necessary to allow the States child care assistance program to compensate such providers, including, but limited to, applying for such State plan amendments or waivers as may necessary to secure federal financial participation for State expenditures under the Child Care and Development Block Grant. c.  The Department of Human Services shall prepare a written report of the review conducted pursuant to subsection a. of this section, post a copy of the report on its Internet website, and, upon request, provide a copy of the report to child care providers participating in the States child care assistance program. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the issuance of the report of the review conducted pursuant to section 1 of this act.